tests/epenthesis.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] forms where there should be no vowel":
    şehir<n><px3sp><nom> : şehri
    şehir<n><dat> : şehre
    burun<n><px3sp><nom> : burnu
    burun<n><dat> : burna
    akıl<n><px3sp><nom> : aklı
    akıl<n><px1sg><nom> : aklım
    akıl<n><dat> : akla

  "[twol] forms where the vowel should epenthesise":
    şehir<n><nom> : şehir
    şehir<n><abl> : şehirden
    şehir<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : şehirsin
    burun<n><nom> : burun
    burun<n><abl> : burundan
    burun<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : burunsun
    akıl<n><nom> : akıl
    akıl<n><abl> : akıldan
    akıl<n><nom>+i<cop><pres><p2><sg> : akılsın


  "[twol] interaction with irregular vowel harmony":
    nakit<n><nom> : nakit
    nakit<n><px3sp><nom> : nakti
    nakit<n><dat> : nakte
